Washington statutes.
RCW 36.65.060

Public employee retirement or disability benefits not affected.

The formation of a city-county shall not have the effect of reducing, restricting, or limiting retirement or disability benefits of any person employed by or retired from a municipal corporation, or who had a vested right in any state or local retirement system, prior to the formation of the city-county.

[ 1984 c 91 s 6.]